Missouri, session 2026, SB1006.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 304.012, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 304.012,
to read as follows:
304.012. 1. Every person operating a motor vehicle on
the roads and highways of this state shall drive the vehicle
in a careful and prudent manner and at a rate of speed so as
not to endanger the property of another or the life or limb
of any person and shall exercise the highest degree of
care. Each motor vehicle, commercial motor vehicle,
recreational motor vehicle, bus, and school bus operated on
the roads and highways of this state shall have an
appropriately endorsed driver who holds a valid license
present with active control of the vehicle at all times.
2. No person operating a motor vehicle on the roads
and highways of this state shall perform stunt driving, as
such term is defined in section 304.145.
3. Any person who violates the provisions of this
section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor, unless an
accident is involved then it shall be a class A misdemeanor.
✓